Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2870.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; REGIONAL MISSISSIPPI OVERPASS MULTIUSE TRAIL BRIDGE.new text end new text begin $3,250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the environment and natural resources trust fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of Ramsey to complete a regional Mississippi overpass multiuse trail bridge. new text end